Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-5,234
License; issuance; renewal.

Upon approval of an application for licensure as an elevator mechanic, the State Fire Marshal may issue a license which shall be renewable biennially if the continuing education requirements are met. The fee for licenses and for license renewal for elevator mechanic licenses and elevator contractor licenses shall be set by the State Fire Marshal under section 81-5,214.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 25;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-2525;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 70.